Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.075

Scope of practice.

An ocularist designs, fabricates, and fits ocular prosthetic appliances. An ocularist is authorized to perform the necessary procedures to provide an ocular prosthetic service for the patient in the ocularist's office or laboratory on referral of a physician. A referral is not required for the replacement of an ocular prosthetic appliance. The ocularist is authorized to make judgment on the needed care, replacement, and use of an ocular prosthetic appliance. The ocularist is authorized to design, fabricate, and fit human prosthetics in the following categories:

(1) Stock and custom prosthetic eyes;

(2) Stock and custom therapeutic scleral shells;

(3) Stock and custom therapeutic painted iris shells;

(4) External orbital and facial prosthetics; and

(5) Ocular conformers: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to allow the fitting or fabricating of contact lenses.

[ 1991 c 180 s 3.]